Florida, session 2026, SB366.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âThe Commissioner of Insurance Regulation shall, 14 by December 31, 2027, initiate a compact with other states to 15 establish a national risk pool for property insurance for 16 natural disasters in order to reduce the financial risks to this 17 state and its residents and shall, as soon as feasible, enter 18 into the compact with at least 14 other member states. 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.